apertium-nn-nb.nb.dix
<pardef n="trip/pel__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>lere</l>      <r>pel<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pel</l>       <r>pel<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>pelt</l>      <r>pel<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>pel<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>pel<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>leste</l>     <r>pel<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lest</l>      <r>pel<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="øve/t__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>tere</l>      <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>        <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>te</l>        <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>teste</l>     <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>test</l>      <r>t<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="bund/et__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nere</l>      <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>neste</l>     <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>nest</l>      <r>et<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="vunne/n__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ste</l>       <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>        <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>n<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="v/ond__adj">
  <!-- wsd todo (make unique lemmas since it carries over!) -->
  <e>       <p><l>erre</l>      <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ondere</l>    <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ond</l>       <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ondt</l>      <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onde</l>      <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onde</l>      <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erste</l>     <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ondeste</l>   <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erst</l>      <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ondest</l>    <r>ond<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="ty__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ere</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>tt</l>        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>este</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="yt/re__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>        <r>re<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ste</l>       <r>re<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>terste</l>    <r>re<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>st</l>        <r>re<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>terst</l>     <r>re<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="tru__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ere</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>este</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>est</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="nøye__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>re</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>         <r><s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ste</l>      <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>       <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="leng/e__adj">
  <!-- todo wsd split lenger (lang) / lengre (lang) -->
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>re</l>        <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ste</l>   <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>st</l>    <r>e<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="f/å__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>ærre</l>      <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>å</l>         <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="posi"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ærreste</l>   <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ærrest</l>    <r>å<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<!-- /adjectives -->
	</pardefs>

<e lm="venstre">         <i>venstre</i><par n="nøye__adj"/></e>
<e lm="avsaget">         <i>avsage</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="beferdet">        <i>beferde</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="beruset">         <i>beruse</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dobbeltløpet">    <i>dobbeltløpe</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="duknakket">       <i>duknakke</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="egnet">           <i>egne</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="enarmet">         <i>enarme</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="enkeltløpet">     <i>enkeltløpe</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ettertraktet">    <i>ettertrakte</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fastspikret">     <i>fastspikre</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fattet">          <i>fatte</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="firkantet">       <i>firkante</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forbasket">       <i>forbaske</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="foreldet">        <i>forelde</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="forfyllet">       <i>forfylle</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fornærmet">       <i>fornærme</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fortvilet">       <i>fortvile</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fullastet">       <i>fullaste</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="funksjonshemmet"> <i>funksjonshemme</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="gullkantet">      <i>gullkante</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="helskinnet">      <i>helskinne</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hjemmelaget">     <i>hjemmelage</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="høyrøstet">       <i>høyrøste</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="konkursrammet">   <i>konkursramme</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mangefarget">     <i>mangefarge</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="mislykket">       <i>mislykke</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="naturfarget">     <i>naturfarge</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nedarvet">        <i>nedarve</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nyopprykket">     <i>nyopprykke</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ondsinnet">       <i>ondsinne</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="oppjaget">        <i>oppjage</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="poliorammet">     <i>polioramme</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="surmaget">        <i>surmage</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="tofarget">        <i>tofarge</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ubegrenset">      <i>ubegrense</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ubemannet">       <i>ubemanne</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uegnet">          <i>uegne</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uforrettet">      <i>uforrette</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="umettet">         <i>umette</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="underutviklet">   <i>underutvikle</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utilsiktet">      <i>utilsikte</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utpreget">        <i>utprege</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="uventet">         <i>uvente</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="velberget">       <i>velberge</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="yrkesrettet">     <i>yrkesrette</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="rede">            <i>rede</i><par n="nøye__adj"/></e>
<e lm="få">              <i>f</i><par n="f/å__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fri">             <i>fri</i><par n="ty__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stri">            <i>stri</i><par n="ty__adj"/></e>
<e lm="bundet">          <i>bund</i><par n="bund/et__adj"/></e>
<e lm="opprevet">        <i>opprev</i><par n="bund/et__adj"/></e>
<e lm="spesialskrevet">  <i>spesialskrev</i><par n="bund/et__adj"/></e>
<e lm="lenge">           <i>leng</i><par n="leng/e__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nøye">            <i>nøye</i><par n="nøye__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sakte">           <i>sakte</i><par n="nøye__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sky">             <i>sky</i><par n="tru__adj"/></e>
<e lm="stille">          <i>stille</i><par n="nøye__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vindstille">          <i>vindstille</i><par n="nøye__adj"/></e>
<e lm="trippel">         <i>trip</i><par n="trip/pel__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vond">            <i>v</i><par n="v/ond__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vunnen">          <i>vunne</i><par n="vunne/n__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ytre">            <i>yt</i><par n="yt/re__adj"/></e>
<e lm="nærbeslektet">    <i>nærbeslekte</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ubesværet">       <i>ubesvære</i><par n="øve/t__adj"/></e>
